Hawaii statutes.
§662-8 Interest. On all final
judgments rendered against the State in actions instituted under this chapter,
interest shall be computed at the rate of four per cent a year from the date of
judgment up to, but not exceeding, thirty days after the date of approval of
any appropriation act providing for payment of the judgment. [L 1957, c 312, pt
of §1; Supp, §245A-8; HRS §662-8]

Attorney General Opinions

Implies that judgments against State not funded by agency
budgets. Att. Gen. Op. 85-8.

Case Notes

Trial court did not err in concluding that the State was
immune from paying more than four per cent per annum post-judgment interest on
the plaintiffs' damages; as State appealed from trial court's judgment and thus
interest began to accrue "after the judgment on appeal", trial court
did not err in concluding that post-judgment interest on the plaintiffs'
damages began to accrue on that date. 105 H. 104, 94 P.3d 659 (2004).

Applicable to judgments against State; interest accrues from
entry of final appellate judgment. 6 H. App. 70, 708 P.2d 829 (1985), aff'd,
68 H. 220, 708 P.2d 824 (1985).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next